Maine, session 132, LD999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶F-13 is enacted to read:
F-13. Any employee of the Maine Indian Tribal-State Commission;
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§17 is enacted to read:
17. Eligibility of persons other than state employees for group health plan. A
person other than a state employee may not be granted eligibility for a group health plan
pursuant to subsection 1 by legislative action to amend subsection 1 unless the person is an
employee of a quasi-governmental entity that receives significant and ongoing operating
funds through a General Fund appropriation.
Page 1 - 132LR1596(03)